Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-113-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-113-55.  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi State University Veterinary School Fund."  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the * * * Department of Finance and Administration Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning to assist Mississippi State University with paying costs associated with the design, construction, renovation, repairs, and equipping of the Wise Center.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of Chapter 534, Laws of 2024, is amended as follows: Section 1.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the amounts listed below from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to each of the following named funds: FUND                  FUND NUMBER             AMOUNT 2024 Local Improvements Projects Fund created in Section 4 of this act $  227,375,000.00 2022 IHL Capital Improvements Fund          6611330000 $  110,000,000.00 2022 Community and Junior Colleges Capital Improvements Fund          6611300000 $   45,000,000.00 2022 State Agencies Capital Improvements Fund          6611320000 $   26,100,000.00 2022 Department of Finance and Administration Statewide Repair and Renovation Fund            6611310000 $   23,900,000.00 Mississippi State University Veterinary School Fund created in Section 9 of this act $   18,000,000.00 Mississippi Site Development Grant Fund                6614170000 $   40,000,000.00 2023 Lafayette County Infrastructure Improvements Fund          6611380000 $  160,000,000.00 2023 Desoto County Infrastructure Improvements Fund          6611370000 $   90,000,000.00 2022 Emergency Road and Bridge Fund            * * *6619440000 6619441000     $ 30,000,000.00 Strategic Multi-Modal Investments Fund           6695500000 $   10,000,000.00 2022 Infrastructure Match Fund                6619430000 $   40,000,000.00 TOTAL $  820,375,000.00 SECTION 3.  During the period beginning July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025, the University of Mississippi Medical Center shall transfer to the State Treasurer from the authorized bank account the sum of Four Million Thirty Thousand Four Hundred Sixteen Dollars ($4,030,416.00) for the Office of Mississippi Physician Workforce, for deposit to the credit of the State Department of Health (Fund No. 333010000) for the physician workforce program that was transferred to the department in House Bill No. 1129, 2024 Regular Session. SECTION 4. There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Veteran's Home Improvement Fund."  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to defray costs associated with the design, construction, and equipping of a new veteran's home to be located in Rankin County.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. SECTION 5.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) from the MSVA-Board CEF (Fund No. 6448200000) to the Mississippi Veteran's Home Improvement Fund created in Section 4 of this act. SECTION 6. There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "United States Fire Insurance Company Settlement Fund."  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to defray costs in compliance with the settlement in Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management vs. United States Fire Insurance Company, Civil Action No. 2024-2039, related to the bookstore at Mississippi Delta Community College.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. SECTION 7.  On July 1, 2025, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Three Hundred Ten Thousand Three Hundred Sixty-two Dollars ($310,362.00) from the Attorney General Contingent Fund (Fund No. 8801700000) to the United States Fire Insurance Company Settlement Fund created in Section 6 of this act. SECTION 8.  (1)  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Two Million Forty-seven Thousand Four Hundred Twenty-five Dollars and Seventy-seven Cents ($2,047,425.77) from the Capital Expense Funds - DFA (Fund No. 6494300000) to the 2022 IHL Capital Improvements Fund (Fund No. 6611330000) created in Section 37-101-83, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  These funds shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to The University of Southern Mississippi, with the approval of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning on those projects related to the universities under its management and control, to pay the costs for the repair or renovation of systems or buildings on the Hattiesburg campus. SECTION 9.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) from the March 2023 Storm Housing Mission Fund (Fund No. 3370300000) to the Hazard Mitigation Administration and Management Fund (Fund No. 337HM00000). SECTION 10.  Upon the effective date of this act and after completion of the transfer in Section 9 of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the remaining balance of the March 2023 Storm Housing Mission Fund (Fund No. 3370300000) to the Disaster Assistance Trust Fund (Fund No. 3372500000). SECTION 11.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Five Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Disaster Assistance Trust Fund (Fund No. 3372500000). SECTION 12.  Section 33-15-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, which is the provision of law creating the March 2023 Storm Housing Mission Fund, shall stand repealed on July 1, 2025. SECTION 13. There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "DBCF Civil Money Penalty Fund," which shall consist of funds received from settlements related to violations committed under the former "Mississippi Money Transmitters Act," which was repealed by House Bill No. 1428, 2025 Regular Session, the "Money Transmission Modernization Act," which was enacted by House Bill No. 1428, 2025 Regular Session, and the "Mississippi S.A.F.E. Mortgage Act" and any funds from any other source designated for deposit into the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of assessment, remediation, operation and maintenance, oversight and administration of licensees within the Consumer Finance and Mortgage divisions of the agency.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. SECTION 14.  During the period beginning July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of One Million Seven Hundred Sixty Thousand Two Hundred Eighty-five Dollars and Eighty-three Cents ($1,760,285.83) from the Consumer Finance Fund (Fund No. 3351200000) to the DBCF Civil Money Penalty Fund created in Section 13 of this act. SECTION 15.  On July 1, 2025, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer and the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, shall transfer the sum of Eighty-eight Million Three Hundred Twenty-eight Thousand Three Hundred Three Dollars ($88,328,303.00), which are monies of the former Commercial Mobile Radio Service Board, from the appropriate financial institutions to the NG911 CMRS Grant Fund created in Section 7 of Senate Bill No. 2835, 2025 Regular Session. SECTION 16.  On July 1, 2025, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer and the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, shall transfer the sum of Seven Hundred Forty-three Thousand Dollars ($743,000.00), which are monies of the former Commercial Mobile Radio Service Board, from the appropriate financial institutions to the State NG911 Fund created in Section 8(h) of Senate Bill No. 2835, 2025 Regular Session. SECTION 17.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($350,000.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Board of Animal Health Disease Response Fund (Fund No. 6642700000). SECTION 18.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Eighteen Million Dollars ($18,000,000.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Mississippi Department of Transportation Strategic Multi-Modal Investments Fund (Fund No. 6695500000). SECTION 19.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Forty Million Dollars ($40,000,000.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Mississippi Department of Transportation 2022 Infrastructure Match Fund (Fund No. 6619430000). SECTION 20.  On July 1, 2025, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) from the Annual Fire Fund (Fund No. 3351500000) to the Rural Fire Truck Matching Assistance Fund (Fund No. 3351800000) created in Section 17-23-1(4), Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 21.  On July 1, 2025, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) from the Annual Fire Fund (Fund No. 3351500000) to the Mississippi Volunteer Firefighter Length of Service Awards Program Fund (Fund No. 3351600000). SECTION 22.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Twelve Million Dollars ($12,000,000.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Mississippi Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund (Fund No. 3316200000) created in Section 49-39-7, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 23. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.